Washington statutes.
RCW 33.32.020

Examinations and reports.

Unless prohibited by the laws of the state in which it is incorporated, a foreign association or like corporation authorized to do business in this state which, by the laws of the state in which it is incorporated, is required to be examined or to make reports to officers of such state, after each such examination or on the making of each such report, shall furnish to the director a copy of such examination or report, certified by the officer of the state making such examination or receiving the report.

[ 1994 c 92 s 450; 1982 c 3 s 59; 1945 c 235 s 81; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-200. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 87; 1913 c 110 s 21; 1890 p 56 ss 14, 37.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.